District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.13

Rules.

Within 60 days of March 3, 2015, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter, including establishing procedures for a business to prove undue hardship.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 14, 61 DCR 11368